New York, session 2025-2026, S5169.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of 2 section 73-a of the public officers law, as amended by section 7 of part 3 QQ of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 4 Every statewide elected official, state officer or employee, member of 5 the legislature, legislative employee and political party chair [and], 6 every candidate for statewide elected office or for member of the legis- 7 lature, and any member of a regional economic development council (even 8 if such member is a volunteer) shall file an annual statement of finan- 9 cial disclosure containing the information and in the form set forth in 10 subdivision three of this section. On or before the fifteenth day of May 11 with respect to the preceding calendar year: (1) every member of the 12 legislature, every candidate for member of the legislature and legisla- 13 tive employee shall file such statement with the legislative ethics 14 commission which shall provide such statement along with any requests 15 for exemptions or deletions to the commission on ethics and lobbying in 16 government for filing and rulings with respect to such requests for 17 exemptions or deletions, on or before the thirtieth day of June; and (2) 18 all other individuals required to file such statement shall file it with 19 the commission on ethics and lobbying in government, except that: 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of June next succeeding 21 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08897-01-5